Missouri, session 2026, HB2613.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 167, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 167.202, to read as follows:
167.202. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Missouri Free
School Meals Program".
2. As used in this section, the term "school" shall mean any school district,
public school, charter school, or private, religious, or parochial school.
3. Each school that participates in the United States Department of Agriculture
National School Lunch Program and has an identified student percentage below the
federal percentage determined for all meals to be reimbursed at the free rate through
the United States Department of Agriculture Community Eligibility Provision shall
participate in the Missouri free school meals program.
4. Each school that participates in the United States Department of Agriculture
National School Lunch Program and has an identified student percentage at or above
the federal percentage determined for all meals to be reimbursed at the free rate
through the United States Department of Agriculture Community Eligibility Provision
shall participate in the Community Eligibility Provision in order to participate in the
Missouri free school meals program.
5. Each school that participates in the Missouri free school meals program shall:
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2613 2
(1) Participate in the United States Department of Agriculture School Breakfast
Program and the United States Department of Agriculture National School Lunch
Program; and
(2) Provide to all students at no cost up to two federally reimbursable meals per
school day, with a maximum of one free breakfast and one free lunch.
6. The department of elementary and secondary education shall provide to every
school participating in the Missouri free school meals program state aid for each school
lunch and breakfast served to a student, with a maximum of one breakfast and one
lunch per student per school day. The amount of state aid per meal shall be equal to the
difference between the applicable federal reimbursement rate at that school site for a
free meal, as determined annually by the United States Department of Agriculture, and
the actual federal reimbursement received by the participating school for the breakfast
or lunch served to the student.
7. The department of elementary and secondary education shall promulgate
rules to implement the provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that
term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this
section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul
a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority
and any rule proposed or adopted after the effective date of this section shall be invalid
and void.
✔